Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202616-1015
Retirement committee; members; terms; vacancy.

(1) Each retirement committee established pursuant to section 16-1014 shall consist of the following six members:

(a) Four members selected by the police officers from the police force of the city; and

(b) Two members selected by the city council of the city.

(2) The members who are not participants in the retirement system shall have a general knowledge of retirement plans.

(3) Members of the governing body of such city may serve on the retirement committee.

(4) The committee members shall be appointed to four-year terms.

(5) Vacancies on a retirement committee shall be filled for the remainder of the term with a person selected in the same manner as the vacating committee member was selected.

(6) Members of any such retirement committee shall receive no salary for serving on such retirement committee and shall not be compensated for expenses related to serving on such retirement committee.

Laws 1983, LB 237, § 15;

Laws 2026, LB822, § 15.
July 18, 2026